de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Schuhpflege > Schuhpolituren & -wachse: Schuhpolituren; Schuhwachse
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 鞋类保养/工具 > 鞋油/鞋蜡: 鞋油; 鞋蜡
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Pomůcky pro péči o obuv > Leštidla a vosky na boty: Leštidla na boty; Vosky na boty
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Грижа за обувки и пособия > Препарати за полиране и вакси: Препарати за полиране на обувки; Вакси за обувки
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Товары для ухода за обувью > Кремы и воск для обуви: Кремы для обуви; Воск для обуви
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Ayakkabı Bakım ve Aletleri > Ayakkabı Parlatıcı ve Cilaları: Ayakkabı Parlatıcı; Ayakkabı Cilaları
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Produse și instrumente pentru îngrijirea încălțămintei > Cremă și ceară de pantofi: Cremă de pantofi; Ceară de pantofi
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Cipőápolás és -eszközök > Cipőfényesítők és -viaszok: Cipőfényesítők; Cipőviaszok
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Njega cipela i dodaci > Laštila i voskovi za cipele: Laštila za cipele; Vosak za cipele
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Kenkien hoito ja välineet > Kenkien kiillotusaineet ja vahat: Kenkien kiillotusaineet; Kenkien vahat
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Είδη & εργαλεία περιποίησης υποδημάτων > Γυαλιστικά & κεριά παπουτσιών: Γυαλιστικά υποδημάτων; Κεριά υποδημάτων
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Dụng cụ chăm sóc giày > Xi & Sáp đánh bóng giày: Xi đánh giày; Sáp đánh giày
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 신발 관리 도구 > 구두 광택제/왁스: 구두 광택제; 구두 왁스
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Schoenverzorging > Schoenpoetsmiddelen: Overige schoenpoetsmiddelen; Schoenwas
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Entretien et accessoires pour chaussures > Cirages et cires à chaussures: Cirages de chaussures; Cires pour chaussures
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Manutenção e ferramentas para sapatos > Polidores e ceras de engraxar sapatos: Graxas para sapatos; Ceras para sapatos
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 鞋子保養工具 > 鞋油/鞋蠟: 打亮鞋油; 鞋蠟
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Batų priežiūra ir įrankiai > Batų tepalas ir vaškas: Batų tepalas; Batų vaškas
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleie og -verktøy > Skokrem og voks for sko: Skokrem; Skovoks
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Shoe Care & Tools > Shoe Polishes & Waxes: Shoe Polishes; Shoe Waxes
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Nega obutve in orodja > Polirne paste in voski za čevlje: Polirne paste za čevlje; Voski za obutev
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Utensílios e cuidado de calçado > Graxas e ceras para calçado: Graxas para calçado; Ceras para calçado
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > เครื่องมือและการดูแลรองเท้า > ยาขัดและแวกซ์สำหรับรองเท้า: ยาขัดรองเท้า; แว็กซ์รองเท้า
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Skovård och skoverktyg > Skokräm och skoputsmedel: Skoputsar; Skovaxer
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Cura delle scarpe > Lucidi e cere scarpe: Lucidi per scarpe; Cere per scarpe
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Cuidado del calzado > Betunes y ceras para zapatos: Betunes para zapatos; Ceras para zapatos
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleje og redskaber > Skopudsemiddel og -voks: Skosværte; Skovoks
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 靴のお手入れ > 靴磨き・靴墨: シューポリッシュ; 靴用ワックス
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Nástroje na starostlivosť o obuv > Leštidlá a vosky na obuv: Leštidlá na obuv; Vosky na obuv
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Środki i narzędzia do pielęgnacji obuwia > Pasty i woski do butów: Pasty do butów; Woski do butów